Maryland, session 2025, HB1208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) “Food” means:
(1) Any substance that is used as food or drink for human beings or as a
component of food or drink for human beings; or
(2) Chewing gum or any substance that is used as a component of chewing
gum.
21–259.4.
A PERSON MAY NOT SELL FOOD THAT CONTAINS RED DYE NO. 3 (CAS NO.
16423–68–0) IN THE STATE UNLESS THE FOOD PACKAGING INCLUDES A
CONSPICUOUS WARNING LABEL THAT STATES THE FOOD CONTAINS RED DYE NO. 3.
21–1215.
(a) This section does not apply to a violation of § 21–220(b)(4), § 21–228, or §
21–259.3 of this title.
(b) A person who violates any provision of Subtitle 2 of this title or any regulation
adopted under Subtitle 2 of this title is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject
to:
(1) A fine not exceeding $10,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or
both; or
(2) If the person has been convicted once of violating Subtitle 2 of this title,
a fine not exceeding $25,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 3 years or both.
(c) In addition to any criminal penalties imposed under this section, a person who
violates any provision of Subtitle 2 of this title, any rule or regulation adopted under
Subtitle 2 of this title, or any term, condition, or limitation of any license or registration
issued under Subtitle 2 of this title:

HOUSE BILL 1208 3
(1) Is subject to a civil penalty not exceeding $5,000, in an action in any
District Court; and
(2) May be enjoined from continuing the violation.
(d) Each day on which a violation occurs is a separate violation under this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health – General
[21–259.4.
A person may not sell food that contains Red Dye No. 3 (CAS No. 16423–68–0) in the
State unless the food packaging includes a conspicuous warning label that states the food
contains Red Dye No. 3.]
21–259.4.
A PERSON MAY NOT MANUFACTURE, SELL, DELIVER, HOLD, OR OFFER FOR
SALE FOOD IN THE STATE THAT CONTAINS:
(1) BROMINATED VEGETABLE OIL (BVO) (CAS NO. 8016–94–2);
(2) POTASSIUM BROMATE (CAS NO. 7758–01–2);
(3) PROPYLPARABEN (CAS NO. 94–13–3); OR
(4) RED DYE NO. 3 (CAS NO. 16423–68–0).
21–1215.
(a) This section does not apply to a violation of § 21–220(b)(4), § 21–228, or §
21–259.3 of this title.
(b) A person who violates any provision of Subtitle 2 of this title or any regulation
adopted under Subtitle 2 of this title is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject
to:
(1) A fine not exceeding $10,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or
both; or
(2) If the person has been convicted once of violating Subtitle 2 of this title,
a fine not exceeding $25,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 3 years or both.

HOUSE BILL 1208
(c) In addition to any criminal penalties imposed under this section, a person who
violates any provision of Subtitle 2 of this title, any rule or regulation adopted under
Subtitle 2 of this title, or any term, condition, or limitation of any license or registration
issued under Subtitle 2 of this title:
(1) Is subject to a civil penalty not exceeding $5,000, in an action in any
District Court; and
(2) May be enjoined from continuing the violation.
(d) Each day on which a violation occurs is a separate violation under this section.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall
take effect October 1, 2028.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.